Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB360.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 525 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "adult performance" means a live:
(a) Sexually explicit performance, as defined in KRS 529.010; or
(b) Performance involving male or female impersonators who provide
entertainment, whether or not performed for consideration, that:
1. To the average person, applying contemporary community standards,
and taken as a whole, predominantly appeals to prurient interest in
sexual conduct;
2. Depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and
3. Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific
value.
(2) A person is guilty of engaging in an adult performance when he or she engages
in an adult performance:
(a) On publicly owned property; or
(b) In a location where the person knows or should know that the adult
performance is likely to be viewed by a person under the age of eighteen
(18) years.
(3) Engaging in an adult performance is a:
(a) Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and
(c) Class D felony for the third and each subsequent offense.
Section 2. Whereas the protection of children is of paramount importance to the
citizens of this Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes
effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/13/2026 12:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1534
law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/13/2026 12:40 PM Jacketed